Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-7531
Hearing; request.

Any insurer, joint underwriting pool, joint reinsurance pool, statistical agent, or advisory organization aggrieved by any order or decision of the director made without a hearing may, within thirty days after notice of the order, make written request to the director for a hearing thereon in accordance with section 44-7532. Pending such hearing and decision, the director may suspend the effective date of his or her action.

Laws 2000, LB 1119, § 31.